Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-610
Maternity homes; hospitals; birth reports.

Maternity homes and lying-in hospitals, and places used as such, shall report to the department on the first day of each month the sex and date of birth of all children born in their respective institutions during the preceding month. The report shall also show the names and addresses of the parents and attending physicians.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VI, art. II, div. IX, § 12, p. 783;

C.S.1922, § 8242;

Laws 1927, c. 166, § 7, p. 451;

C.S.1929, § 71-2414;

R.S.1943, § 71-610;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 522;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 411.